Hawaii statutes.
§454M-2 License
required. (a) No person except those exempted under this chapter shall
engage in the business of mortgage servicing without a license as provided in
this chapter.

(b) No person shall engage in the business of
mortgage servicing in this State unless the person providing services has a
physical presence in the State pursuant to section 454M‑5(b)(6). [L 2009,
c 106, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 48, §8; am L 2012, c 245, §3; am L 2015, c 62, §3;
am L 2016, c 122, §20]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next